Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4640
Bonds authorized.

Following (1) the completion or dismissal of all appeals and upon a final judgment being pronounced in the case and (2) the approval of the voters to condemn the gas system at the election provided for in section 19-4637, the governing body of the city may issue and sell bonds of the city to pay the amount of the value of the gas system set out in the award and any other obligations of the city arising from the condemnation including, but not limited to, acquisitions costs, fees, court costs, and related expenses. Such bonds may be issued and sold without an additional vote of the registered voters of the city.

Laws 2002, LB 384, § 17.